Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated to the Bureau  of Labor and Industries, for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2017, out of the General Fund, the amount of $13,247,138.
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$9,451,997 is  established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limit for
payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received by  the Bureau of Labor
and Industries.
SECTION 3. (1) Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$2,832,533 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limit  for
payment of administrative expenses by the Bureau of Labor and  Industries from the Wage
Security Fund.
(2) For the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, expenditures by  the Bureau of Labor and
Industries for wage claim payments from the Wage Security Fund are not limited.
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$1,259,556 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limit  for
payment of expenses from federal funds collected or received by the Bureau of Labor  and
Industries.
SECTION 5. This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2017 Act takes effect
July 1, 2017.
Enrolled House Bill 5016 (HB 5016-A) Page 1
Passed by House June 6, 2017
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 15, 2017
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Dennis Richardson, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5016 (HB 5016-A) Page 2